Tennessee, session 114, HB2431.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 213 of the Private Acts of 1992, as amended by Chapter 91 of the
Private Acts of 2006, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting Article 3,
Section 2 in its entirety and replacing it with the following:
Section 2. Residence. Residence in the city at the time of appointment of a city
administrator is not required as a condition of the appointment, but within ninety (90)
days after reporting for work, the city administrator must reside within a fifty-mile radius
of the municipal limits of the City of South Pittsburg.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the Board of Mayor and Commissioners of the City of South Pittsburg.
Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the legislative body and certified to the
secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
HB2431
010609
- 1 -